da: Seddelkvalitet: Omkring ucirkuleret (AU); Ekstremt fin (XF/EF); Rimelig; Fin (F); God (G); Dårlig; Ucirkuleret (UNC); Meget fin (VF); Meget god (VG); Andet
hu: Bankjegy minősítése: Gyakorlatilag forgalmatlan (AU); Kiváló (XF/EF); Elfogadható; Szép (F); Jó (G); Gyenge; Forgalmatlan (UNC); Nagyon szép (VF); Nagyon jó (VG); Egyéb
zh-TW: 紙幣等級: 近乎未流通 (AU); 極美 (XF/EF); 尚可 (Fair); 精美 (F); 良好 (G); 劣質 (Poor); 未流通 (UNC); 優美 (VF); 極佳 (VG); 其他
nl: Bankbiljetgradering: Bijna ongecirculeerd (AU); Zeer fraai (XF/EF); Redelijk; Fraai (F); Goed (G); Slecht; Ongecirculeerd (UNC); Zeer fraai (VF); Zeer goed (VG); Overig
ja: 紙幣グレード: 準未使用 (AU); 極美品 (XF/EF); 劣品 (Fair); 美品 (F); 佳品 (G); 劣悪品 (Poor); 未使用 (UNC); 上美品 (VF); 並品 (VG); その他
zh-CN: 纸币等级: 近未流通 (AU); 极美 (XF/EF); 一般; 普美 (F); 良好 (G); 差; 未流通 (UNC); 优美 (VF); 很好 (VG); 其他
cs: Stav bankovky (grade): Téměř neobíhající (AU); Extrémně zachovalá (XF/EF); Dostatečná (Fair); Velmi dobrá (F); Dobrá (G); Špatná (Poor); Neobíhající (UNC); Velmi krásná (VF); Velmi dobrá (VG); Jiné
lt-LT: Banknoto įvertinimas: Beveik apyvartoje nebuvę (AU); Ypač gerai išsilaikę (XF / EF); Patenkinamos būklės; Gerai išsilaikę (F); Geros būklės (G); Prastos būklės; Nebuvę apyvartoje (UNC); Labai gerai išsilaikę (VF); Labai geros būklės (VG); Kita
sl-SI: Razred bankovcev: Skoraj neobtočni (AU); Izjemno lepo (XF/EF); Zadovoljivo; Lepo (F); Dobro (G); Slabo; Neobtočeno (UNC); Zelo lepo (VF); Zelo dobro (VG); Drugo
pt-PT: Grau das notas bancárias: Quase não circulada (AU); Extremamente bem conservada (XF/EF); Razoável; Bem conservada (F); Boa (G); Fraca; Não circulada (UNC); Muito bem conservada (VF); Muito boa (VG); Outra
en: Banknote grade: About Uncirculated (AU); Extremely Fine (XF/EF); Fair; Fine (F); Good (G); Poor; Uncirculated (UNC); Very Fine (VF); Very Good (VG); Other
vi: Phân loại tiền giấy: Gần như chưa lưu hành (AU); Cực kỳ đẹp (XF/EF); Trung bình; Đẹp (F); Khá (G); Kém; Chưa lưu hành (UNC); Rất đẹp (VF); Rất khá (VG); Khác
de: Banknotenbewertung: Fast unzirkuliert (AU); Vorzüglich (XF/EF); Gering erhalten (Fair); Schön (F); Gut erhalten (G); Schlecht erhalten (Poor); Unzirkuliert (UNC); Sehr schön (VF); Sehr gut erhalten (VG); Sonstige
pl: Ocena banknotu: Prawie menniczy (AU); Znakomity (XF/EF); Zadowalający (Fair); Piękny (F); Dobry (G); Zły (Poor); Menniczy (UNC); Bardzo piękny (VF); Bardzo dobry (VG); Inne
it: Grado di banconota: Quasi fior di stampa (AU); Estremamente bella (XF/EF); Discreta; Bella (F); Buona (G); Scadente; Non circolata (UNC); Bellissima (VF); Molto bella (VG); Altro
bg-BG: Степен на банкнотите: Почти нециркулирала (AU); Изключително запазена (XF/EF); Приемлива; Добре запазена (F); Добра (G); Лоша; Нециркулирала (UNC); Много добре запазена (VF); Много добра (VG); Друго
el: Διαβάθμιση τραπεζογραμματίου: Σχεδόν ακυκλοφόρητο (AU); Εξαιρετικά καλό (XF/EF); Αποδεκτό; Καλό (F); Αρκετά καλό (G); Φθαρμένο; Ακυκλοφόρητο (UNC); Πολύ καλό (VF); Λίαν καλό (VG); Άλλο
es: Grado de billete: Casi sin circular (AU); Extremadamente fina (XF/EF); Regular; Fina (F); Buena (G); Pobre; Sin circular (UNC); Muy fina (VF); Muy buena (VG); Otra
hr-HR: Ocjena novčanica: Gotovo necirkulirano (AU); Odlično (XF/EF); Slabo; Lijepo (F); Dobro (G); Loše; Necirkulirano (UNC); Vrlo lijepo (VF); Vrlo dobro (VG); Ostalo
sk-SK: Trieda bankovky: Takmer neobehová (AU); Mimoriadne zachovalá (XF/EF); Dostatočná (Fair); Zachovalá (F); Dobrá (G); Slabá; Neobehová (UNC); Veľmi zachovalá (VF); Veľmi dobrá (VG); Iné
ro-RO: Clasificarea bancnotei: Aproape necirculată (AU); Extrem de fină (XF/EF); Acceptabilă; Fină (F); Bună (G); Slabă; Necirculată (UNC); Foarte fină (VF); Foarte bună (VG); Altele
ru: Состояние банкноты: Почти не бывшая в обращении (AU); Отличное (XF/EF); Посредственное; Хорошее (F); Удовлетворительное (G); Плохое; Не бывшая в обращении (UNC); Очень хорошее (VF); Вполне удовлетворительное (VG); Другое
ko: 지폐 등급: 준미사용(AU); 극미품(XF/EF); 열품(Fair); 미품(F); 병품(G); 불량(Poor); 미사용(UNC); 우미품(VF); 보통품(VG); 기타
th: เกรดธนบัตร: สภาพเกือบใหม่ (AU); สภาพสวยงามมาก (XF/EF); สภาพพอใช้; สภาพสวย (F); สภาพดี (G); สภาพชำรุด; สภาพใหม่ไม่ผ่านการใช้งาน (UNC); สภาพสวยงาม (VF); สภาพดีมาก (VG); อื่นๆ
nb: Seddelkvalitet: Nesten usirkulert (AU); Ekstra god kvalitet (XF/EF); Akseptabel; God kvalitet (F); God (G); Dårlig; Usirkulert (UNC); Meget god kvalitet (VF); Meget god (VG); Annet
fi: Setelin luokitus: Melkein kiertämätön (AU); Erittäin hieno (XF/EF); Kohtalainen; Hieno (F); Hyvä (G); Huono; Kiertämätön (UNC); Oikein hieno (VF); Erittäin hyvä (VG); Muu
sv: Sedelkvalitet: Nästan ocirkulerad (AU); Extremt fin (XF/EF); Acceptabel; Fin (F); God (G); Dålig; Ocirkulerad (UNC); Mycket fin (VF); Mycket god (VG); Övrigt
tr: Banknot derecesi: Çil altı (AU); Ekstra temiz (XF/EF); Makul; Temiz (F); İyi (G); Zayıf; Çil (UNC); Çok temiz (VF); Çok iyi (VG); Diğer
pt-BR: Grau de qualidade das cédulas bancárias: Quase Flor de Estampa (AU); Extremamente Bem Conservada (XF/EF); Razoável; Bem Conservada (F); Boa (G); Ruim; Flor de Estampa (UNC); Muito Bem Conservada (VF); Muito Boa (VG); Outro
fr: Grade du billet de banque: Presque non circulé (AU); Extrêmement beau (XF/EF); Passable; Beau (F); Bon (G); Médiocre; Non circulé (UNC); Très beau (VF); Très bon (VG); Autre